California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(1) The name of the assessee, and where there is more than one valuation the name of the assessee need be listed only once. For the purposes of this section, the name of the assessee may be the name of the assessee as shown on the current roll.

(2) The description of the property.

(3) The total amount necessary to redeem the property as of the date specified in the publication.

This information required to be published is the “published delinquent list.” If any tax-defaulted property is redeemed, the information relating to the property may be omitted from any publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 340, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3373.

Except as provided in Article 1.8 (commencing with Section 3381), the publication shall be made pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in the county. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the county, the publication shall be made by posting in three public places in the county.

The cost of publication shall be at no more than the rate fixed by the board of supervisors for other county advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

3374.

Immediately after the publication is completed, the tax collector shall file with the county recorder a copy of the publication and an attached affidavit. This affidavit is prima facie evidence of the facts stated. The affidavit shall show:

(a) That it is affixed to a true copy of the publication.

(b) The manner of publication.

(c) If the publication was in a newspaper, its name and place of publication and the date of each appearance.

(d) If not published in a newspaper, the places of posting.

The county recorder may destroy such publications and affidavits that have been on file in the recorder’s office for more than seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

3375.

The county tax collector or assessor, whichever is applicable, shall notify the Controller within 60 days, in the manner as the Controller shall direct, of all property subject to a “Notice of Lien for Postponed Property Taxes” recorded pursuant to Section 16182 of the Government Code and for which notice of any of the following has been expeditiously processed:

(a) Becomes tax defaulted subsequent to the date of entry on the secured roll of the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 2514; or

(b) The claimant of which transfers ownership or changes his or her mailing address, and the property is a residential property; or

(c) The claimant of which has been determined to be deceased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 19.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3376.

(a) Upon request of the tax collector, the Controller shall provide to the tax collector information that is required for the preparation and enforcement of the sale of property under Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351) of Division 1. This information may include social security numbers.

(b) The tax collector or his or her designee shall certify, under penalty of perjury, to the Controller, that the information requested pursuant to subdivision (a) is required for the purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Any information provided to the tax collector pursuant subdivision (a) is not a public record and is not open to public
 inspection.

(d) In the event of a tax-defaulted property sale, the tax collector or assessor shall include the outstanding balance of the property tax postponement loan in the minimum bid. Should the property fail to receive the minimum bid, and the minimum bid is reduced, all moneys paid to the Controller’s office and county tax collector shall be a proportionate allocation of the total moneys owed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 20.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.8. Alternative Method of Publication [3381. - 3385.]

3381.

(a) In each county where the tax collector or, if the county is a chartered county, the board of supervisors determines that the public interest, convenience and necessity require the local publication of the delinquent list required by Section 3371, or the published notice of power and intent to sell required by Section 3361, in order to afford adequate notice, all items required to be published shall be published as provided in this article.

(b) After the determination, the tax collector or, if the county is a chartered county, the board of supervisors shall divide and distribute the items to be published and cause the same to be published either
 within (1) the municipal corporations, (2) the elementary, high school, or junior college districts, (3) the supervisorial districts, (4) public notice districts described in Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, (5) tax districts, areas included in map books, or tax code areas, or (6) by any annexation or annexations of same, or any combination of same, or any combination of those districts, annexations, areas included in map books, and tax code areas, within the county as they shall determine most likely to afford adequate notice to owners of the property.

(c) Except as provided in this article, the publication shall be in the same manner as provided in Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 3371).

(d) The publication provided
 for in this article shall be made once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation. The publication shall be made in a newspaper published not less frequently than once a week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 20.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3382.

Annually, the board of supervisors shall let the contracts for publication of the published delinquent list, or the published notice of power and intent to sell, and shall determine the rate to be paid for those publications or any portions thereof.

The publication rate shall be based on a common denominator of measurement for all newspapers and may be graduated according to circulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

3383.

The contracts for the publications shall include the publication of the proper portion of the published list and all other items relating to that portion of the published list required by law to be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

3384.

The board of supervisors may provide by order for mailing to each assessee on the published delinquent list a copy of the items delinquent assessed to him and, if so ordered, the copy shall be mailed to the assessee at his address as shown on the roll. This section gives no one any right to receive the copy of items delinquent, and neither the county nor any office or employee is liable for failure of the assessee to receive the copy or for any mistake in connection with the mailing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

3385.

In ordering mailing of a copy of items delinquent, the board of supervisors may do either of the following:

(a) Authorize the tax collector to perform the mailing.

(b) Include, or authorize the inclusion of the mailing as an item in the contracts for publication of the published delinquent list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Sale by Operation of Law [3436. - 3444.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3436. - 3444.]

3436.

At 12:01 a.m. on July 1, the taxes, assessments, penalties, and costs on real property except tax-defaulted property and possessory interests, which have not been paid shall by operation of law be declared in default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3437.

The amount due on any property may be paid until the close of business on June 30 if it was separately valued on the secured roll. If June 30 falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, and payment is received by the close of business on the next business day, redemption penalties shall not attach. If the board of supervisors, by adoption of an ordinance or resolution, closes the county’s offices for business prior to the time of delinquency on the “next business day” or for that whole day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section. Section 2512 shall apply to remittances made by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3438.

If the tax collector discovers before the declaration that because of any error the tax on a parcel of real property should not be declared in default, he or she shall not declare it in default and the board of supervisors shall cause the assessor to enter the uncollected taxes on the next roll, to be collected like other taxes on that roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 21.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3439.

In appropriate columns on the delinquent roll, or the secured roll if the delinquent roll has been dispensed with, opposite each parcel separately valued the taxes on which have been declared in default, the tax collector shall enter “tax defaulted,” the date of the declaration, and the total amount declared to be in default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 22.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3441.

Every person who does any act tending permanently to impair the value of tax-defaulted property is guilty of a misdemeanor and is liable for any damages sustained by the county or public agency because of his or her act. Those acts include, but are not limited to, the removal, destruction, or cutting of any improvements or timber. On request of the tax collector of the county where any part of the property is located, the district attorney of the same county shall:

(a) Prosecute for the commission of the misdemeanor.

(b) In the name of the people, sue for damages sustained by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 24.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3442.

Within 30 days after the declaration of default, the tax collector shall furnish the auditor with a list of all tax-defaulted property. The auditor shall enter on the current roll immediately after the description of the property the fact and date of declaration of default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 25.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3443.

The tax collector shall transmit the list of property to the assessor who shall enter on his or her records the fact and date of the declaration of default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 26.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3443.5.

In lieu of the procedure specified in Section 3443, where a machine-prepared roll is used, the fact and date of the declaration of default may be entered upon the reproduced roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 27.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3444.

If the original declaration of default by operation of law is ever canceled or held void, the property shall be treated for all purposes as if in default in the next subsequent year for which it would have been validly declared in default but for the previous declaration of default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 28.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. Medium of Payment [3451. - 3456.]

3451.

The tax collector may, in his or her discretion, accept any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504 in payment for tax-defaulted property and tax-defaulted property sold at public auction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3452.

The acceptance of negotiable paper constitutes payment for tax-defaulted property and tax-defaulted property sold at public auction as of the date of acceptance when, but not before, the negotiable paper is duly paid.

When negotiable paper is so accepted, the deed to the property so purchased shall not be delivered until that negotiable paper is duly paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 33.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3455.

If any negotiable paper is not paid on due presentation for any reason, any record of payment made on any official record because of its acceptance shall be canceled, and the bid upon which the negotiable paper was accepted shall be voided as if no bid had been made, and the original owner’s right of redemption is revived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 13.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

3456.

(a) If any part of a bid that was accepted by the tax collector is not paid when due, the county shall have a claim against the bidder for the actual cost of the sale. Immediately upon becoming past due, the tax collector shall notify the bidder by certified mail, which notice shall include all of the following:

(1) That his or her bid has been voided because of the delinquent payment.

(2) The amount of the county’s claim against the bidder.

(3) That the amount of the claim will be deducted from any deposit submitted by the bidder and that any remaining amount of the deposit is forfeited.

(b) If a bidder does not pay the claim arising under subdivision (a) within 30 days after the notice is sent, both of the following apply:

(1) The county may utilize any means authorized by law to collect the claim, including, but not limited to, transferring the amount of the claim to the unsecured roll.

(2) The tax collector may prohibit the bidder from bidding on sales made pursuant to this chapter for up to five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Sale to Private Parties After Deed to State [3691. - 3731.1.]

3691.

(a) (1) (A) Five years or more, or three years or more in the case of nonresidential commercial property, after the property has become tax defaulted, the tax collector shall have the power to sell and shall attempt to sell in accordance with Section 3692 all or any portion of tax-defaulted property that has not been redeemed, without regard to the boundaries of the parcels, as provided in this chapter, unless by other provisions of law the property is not subject to sale. Any person, regardless of any prior or existing lien on, claim to, or interest in, the property, may purchase at the sale. In the case of tax-defaulted property that has been damaged by a disaster in an area declared to be a disaster area by local, state, or federal officials and whose damage has not been substantially
 repaired, the five-year period set forth in this subdivision shall be tolled until five years have elapsed from the date the damage to the property was incurred.

(B) A county may elect, by an ordinance or resolution adopted by a majority vote of its entire governing body, to adopt conditions and procedures for the delay of sale of properties as described in subparagraph (A) that it finds may be eligible to file a property tax postponement claim with the State Controller prior to January 1, 2017, and may cancel any delinquent penalties, costs, fees, and interest associated with these properties.

(C) A county may elect, by an ordinance or resolution adopted by a majority vote of its entire governing body, to have the five-year time period described in subparagraph (A) apply to tax-defaulted nonresidential commercial property.

(D) For purposes of this subdivision, “nonresidential commercial property” means all property except the following:

(i) A constructed single-family or multifamily unit that is intended to be used primarily as a permanent residence, is used primarily as a permanent residence, or that is zoned as a residence, and the land on which that unit is constructed.

(ii) Real property that is used and zoned for producing commercial agricultural commodities.

(2) When a part of a tax-defaulted parcel is sold, the balance continues subject to redemption and shall be separately valued for the purpose of redemption in the manner provided by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4131) of Part 7.

(3) (A) The tax collector shall provide notice of an intended sale under this subdivision in the manner prescribed by Sections 3704 and 3704.5 and any other applicable statute. If the intended sale is of nonresidential commercial property that has been tax-defaulted for fewer than five years, all of the following apply:

(i) On or before the notice date, the tax collector shall also mail, in the manner specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2924b of the Civil Code, notice containing any information contained in the publication required under Sections 3704 and 3704.5 to, as applicable, all of the following:

(I) The parties specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 2924b of the Civil Code.

(II) Each taxing agency specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2924b of the Civil Code.

(III) Any beneficiary of a deed of trust or a mortgagee of any mortgage recorded against the nonresidential commercial property, and any assignee or vendee of these beneficiaries or mortgagees.

(ii) For purposes of this paragraph:

(I) “Notice date” means a date not less than 45 days nor more than 120 days before an
 intended sale or not less than 45 days nor more than 120 days before the date upon which the property may be sold.

(II) “Recording date of the notice of default” as used in subdivision (c) of Section 2924b of the Civil Code means a date that is 30 days before the notice date.

(III) “Deed of trust or mortgage being foreclosed” as
 used in subdivision (c) of Section 2924b of the Civil Code means the defaulted tax lien.

(B) If the property subject to the notice required by this paragraph is the subject of a bankruptcy proceeding, the notice shall constitute a “notice of tax deficiency” pursuant to Section 362(b)(9)(B) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) (A) Three years or more after the property has become tax defaulted and a request has been made by a city, county, city and county, or nonprofit organization pursuant to Section 3692.4, or a request has been made by a person or entity that has recorded a nuisance abatement lien on that property, to offer that property at the next scheduled tax sale, the tax collector shall have the power to sell and
 may sell all or any portion of tax-defaulted property that has not been redeemed, without regard to the boundaries of parcels, as provided in this chapter at the next scheduled tax sale, unless by other provisions of law the property is not subject to sale. Any person, regardless of any prior or existing lien on, claim to, or interest in, the property, may purchase at the sale.

(B) When a part of a tax-defaulted parcel is sold, the balance continues subject to redemption and shall be separately valued for the purpose of redemption in the manner provided by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4131) of Part 7.

(2) Before the tax collector sells vacant residential developed property pursuant to this subdivision, actual notice, by certified mail, shall be provided to the property owner, if the property owner’s identity can be determined from the county assessor’s or county recorder’s
 records. The tax collector’s power of sale shall not be affected by the failure of the property owner to receive notice.

(3) Before the tax collector sells vacant residential developed property pursuant to this subdivision, notice of the sale shall be given in the manner specified by Section 3704.7.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision apply to property that becomes tax defaulted on or after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (SB 1506)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.1.

(a) The tax collector shall execute a notice whenever a parcel becomes subject to the power of sale set forth in Section 3691 on a form prescribed by the Controller. The county clerk shall take acknowledgment of the notice without charge.

(b) If the property subject to the notice required by this section is the subject of a bankruptcy proceeding, the notice shall constitute a “notice of tax deficiency” pursuant to Section 362(b)(9)(B) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 119, Sec. 3.   (SB 1506)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.2.

The notice shall specify:

(a) A statement that five years or more have elapsed since the taxes or assessments on the parcel were declared in default; that three years or more in the case of nonresidential commercial property, as defined in Section 3691, have elapsed since the taxes or assessments on the parcel were declared in default; or that, pursuant to Section 3692.4, three years or more have elapsed and a request has been made by a city, county, city and county, or nonprofit organization to offer that property at the next scheduled public auction.

(b) That the property was duly assessed for taxation and the tax legally levied.

(c) That the property is subject to sale for nonpayment of taxes.

(d) The amount of taxes originally declared to be in default, unless there has been a partial cancellation of taxes, a redemption from a portion thereof, or a correction under Sections 4831.5 and 4876.5, in any of which events, the amount shall be the balance remaining.

(e) A metes and bounds or lot-block-tract description of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 944, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.3.

By June 15 of the year property is to become subject to a power of sale under Section 3691, the assessor shall furnish to the tax collector a metes and bounds or lot-block-tract description of the property.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3512.1 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 37.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.4.

The notice shall be recorded with the county recorder. After recordation, the notice shall be forwarded to the tax collector. The recorder shall make no charge for the recording.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.5.

The tax collector shall file the notice in his or her office and keep a record to show the subsequent disposition of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.6.

Upon request of the Controller, the tax collector shall report the disposition of all tax-defaulted parcels subject to tax collections power to sell in his or her county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 321.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.

(a) The tax collector shall attempt to sell tax-defaulted property, as provided in this chapter, within four years of the time that the property becomes subject to sale for nonpayment of taxes unless, by other provisions of law, the property is not subject to sale. If there are no acceptable bids at the attempted sale, the tax collector shall attempt to sell the property at intervals of no more than six years until the property is sold.

(b) When oil, gas, or mineral rights are subject to sale for nonpayment of taxes, the tax collector may offer the interest at minimum bid to the holders of outstanding interests where the interest subject to sale is a
 partial interest or, where the interest subject to sale is a complete and undivided interest, to the owner or owners of the property to which the oil, gas, or mineral rights are appurtenant.

(c) When parcels that are rendered unusable by their size, location, or other conditions are subject to sale for nonpayment of taxes, the tax collector may offer the parcel, at a minimum bid, to owners of contiguous parcels or to a holder of record of either a predominant easement or a right-of-way easement. If the parcel is sold to a contiguous property owner, the tax collector shall require that the successful bidder request the assessor and the planning director to combine the unusable parcel with the bidder’s own parcel as a condition of sale.

(d) Sealed bid sale procedures shall be used
 when offers are made pursuant to subdivision (b) or subdivision (c), and the property shall be sold to the highest eligible bidder. The offers shall remain in effect for 30 days or until notice is given pursuant to Section 3702, whichever is later. If the highest bidder does not consummate the sale within the time period determined by the tax collector, the tax collector may offer the property to the next highest bidder at their bid price.

(e) The Notice to the Board of Supervisors and Notice of Intended Sale of Tax-Defaulted Property shall indicate that any parcel remaining unsold may be reoffered within a 90-day period and any new parties of interest shall be notified in accordance with Section 3701. This subdivision does not apply to properties sold pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 4.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of this chapter, all of the following apply:

(a) “Close of auction” means the date and time for which the tax collector, or his or her designee, provides public notice of both of the following:

(1) That no additional property will be offered for sale for that public auction.

(2) That bidding for that public auction will end.

(b) “Date of the sale” means the date upon which a public auction begins.

(c) “Public auction” means any venue or medium to sell property under this chapter that provides reasonable access to the public to bid on and purchase this property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.2.

A public auction conducted by electronic media, including the Internet, to sell property under this chapter shall have at least the following operational components:

(a) A component that allows bids to be submitted by computer.

(b) A component that authorizes the tax collector to accept bids for as long as he or she deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.3.

(a) All property sold under this chapter is offered and sold as is.

(b) The state, the county, and an employee of these entities acting in the employee’s official capacity in preparing, conducting, and executing a sale of property under this chapter, are not liable for any of the following:

(1) Known or unknown conditions of this property, including, but not limited to, errors in the assessor’s records pertaining to improvement of the property.

(2) The failure of a device that is not owned, operated, and managed by the state or county, that prevents a person from participating in any sale under this chapter. For purposes of this paragraph, “device” includes, but is not limited to, computer hardware, a computer network, a computer software application, and a computer Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county, city, city and county, or any nonprofit organization as defined in Section 3772.5, may request the tax collector to bring to the next scheduled public auction any residential real property that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The property taxes have been delinquent for at least three years.

(2) The real property will serve the public benefit of providing housing directly related to low-income persons.

(3) The real property is not occupied by the owner as his or her principal place of residence.

(b) Every request submitted to the tax collector shall include the following:

(1) A formal resolution of the governing board of the county, city, city and county, or nonprofit organization, requesting the accelerated auction of the real property and stating the public benefit.

(2) A written plan for the development, rehabilitation, or proposed use of the real property and how low-income persons will be served.

(c) Upon receiving a request as provided by this section, the tax collector shall include the real property in the next scheduled public auction.

(d) (1) If the real property is acquired by a nonprofit organization at auction, a deed restriction shall be placed on
 the real property, requiring the real property to be used for low-income housing for a period of at least 30 years.

(2) (A) In lieu of the 30-year restriction required by paragraph (1), the deed may provide for equity sharing upon resale, if the real property is a single-family home that will be sold by the nonprofit organization to a low-income owner-occupant.

(B) To the extent not in conflict with another public funding source or law, all of the following shall apply to an equity-sharing agreement provided for by the deed:

(i) Upon resale by an owner-occupant of the home, the owner-occupant of the home shall retain the market value of any improvements, the downpayment, and his or her proportionate share of appreciation. The nonprofit organization shall recapture any initial subsidy and its
 proportionate share of appreciation, which shall then be used for the purpose of providing financial assistance to low-income homebuyers.

(ii) For purposes of this subdivision, the initial subsidy shall be equal to the fair market value of the home at the time of initial sale to the low-income owner-occupant minus the initial sale price to the low-income owner-occupant, plus the amount of any downpayment assistance or mortgage assistance. If upon resale by the owner-occupant the market value is lower than the initial market value, then the value at the time of the resale shall be used as the initial market value.

(iii) For purposes of this subdivision, the nonprofit organization’s proportionate share of appreciation shall be equal to the ratio of the initial subsidy to the fair market value of the home at the time of initial sale.

(e) This section may not be construed to preclude the application, to the real property or the current owners of that property, of any other provision of law not in conflict with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 632, Sec. 7.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3693.

(a) With the exception of the sealed bid sale procedures authorized under Section 3692 and of the procedures authorized in subdivisions (b) and (c), all sales pursuant to this chapter shall be at public auction to the highest bidder. The amount of the high bid shall be paid by any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504, which method is at the discretion of the tax collector. Unless otherwise specified by the tax collector, payment is due on or before the close of auction.

(b) For nonresidential commercial property, if the highest bidder does not consummate the sale within the time period determined by the tax collector, the tax collector may offer the property to the next highest bidder at their bid price.

(c) If a sale occurs at a public auction for a parcel of property subject to this chapter and the sale is unconsummated, if the next public auction for that parcel of property occurs more than one year after the date of that first auction and the highest bidder does not consummate that subsequent sale within the time period determined by the tax collector, the tax collector may offer that property, regardless of type, for sale to the next
 highest bidder at their price.

(d) The tax collector may require a person to submit a deposit, by any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504, for the purposes specified in this subdivision. A tax collector requiring a deposit pursuant to Section 3693.1 may determine, and shall provide public notice before the date of the sale upon determining, all of the following:

(1) The method of payment of this deposit.

(2) The amount
 of this deposit.

(3) The due date of this deposit.

(4) Whether the deposit will be applied for one or more of the following purposes:

(A) As a condition to submitting a bid on property that is being sold under this chapter.

(B) As a payment toward specified property that is being sold under this chapter. If a deposit is applied for this purpose, the deposit may be applied as payment toward more than one specified property based upon the amount of the minimum bid for each property.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until
 January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 5.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------

3693.

(a) With the exception of the sealed bid sale procedures authorized under Section 3692, all sales pursuant to this chapter shall be at public auction to the highest bidder. The amount of the high bid shall be paid by any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504, which method is at the discretion of the tax collector. Unless otherwise specified by the tax collector, payment is due on or before the close of auction.

(b) The tax collector may require a person to submit a deposit, by any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504, for the purposes specified in this subdivision. A tax collector requiring a deposit pursuant to Section 3693.1 may determine, and shall provide public notice before the date of the
 sale upon determining, all of the following:

(1) The method of payment of this deposit.

(2) The amount of this deposit.

(3) The due date of this deposit.

(4) Whether the deposit will be applied for one or more of the following purposes:

(A) As a condition to submitting a bid on property that is being sold under this chapter.

(B) As a payment toward specified property that is being sold under this chapter. If a deposit is applied for this purpose, the deposit may be applied as payment toward more than one specified property based upon the amount of the minimum bid for each property.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 6.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3693.1.

Notwithstanding Section 3693, the tax collector may make the sale of any property sold under this chapter a cash or deferred-payment transaction. If the tax collector approves the sale as a deferred-payment transaction, the tax collector may require a deposit in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or 10 percent of the minimum bid price, whichever is greater. The balance of the purchase price shall be paid by any method of payment authorized by Section 2502, 2503.2, or 2504, as specified by the tax collector and within a period specified by the tax collector not to exceed 90 days from the date of the close of auction as a condition precedent to the transfer of title to the purchaser. If the purchaser was required to pay a deposit prior to the date of the sale, the deposit shall be applied toward the purchase price of the property. Failure on the part of the successful bidder to consummate the sale within the period specified by the tax collector shall result in the forfeiture of the deposit and all rights he or she may have with respect to that property. Any forfeiture of deposit shall be distributed to the county general fund and shall not apply to outstanding delinquent taxes. Upon forfeiture the right of redemption shall revive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 264, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3694.

A sale under this chapter shall take place only if approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3695.

(a) If the governing body of any taxing agency does not, before the date of the first publication of notice of intended sale pursuant to Sections 3702 and 3703, file with the tax collector and the board of supervisors certified copies of a resolution adopted by the governing body objecting to the sale, the taxing agency has consented to the sale. If the taxing agency consents to the sale the lien of its taxes or assessments and any rights which it may have to the property as a result of these taxes or assessments are canceled by a sale under this chapter and it is entitled to its proper share of the proceeds deposited in the delinquent tax sale trust fund. If the taxing agency does object to the sale, the lien of its taxes or assessments or any rights which the taxing agency may have to the
 property are not affected by a sale under this chapter. Provided, however, that any taxing agency that is also a revenue district may not object to a sale unless it files with this objection an executed proposed agreement under Chapter 8 of this part to purchase the property, but not including an option to purchase, at a price not less than the minimum bid.

(b) If a taxing agency that is not also a revenue district objects to the sale and, before the date of the first publication of notice of intended sale pursuant to Sections 3702 and 3703, applies in writing to the board of supervisors to purchase the property under Chapter 8 of this part at a price equal to that approved by the board of supervisors, or upon a pro rata division of the proceeds of a sale as may be provided under Chapter 8, the tax collector shall not proceed with the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   (AB 3288)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3695.3.

As used in Section 3695, “assessments” does not include assessments which were, at the time of the declaration of default or sale to the taxing agency, not included in the amount required to redeem the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 54.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3695.4.
